District of Columbia statutes.
46-411

Consent of parent or guardian.

If any person intending to marry and seeking a license therefor shall be under 18 years of age, and shall not have been previously married, the said Clerk shall not issue such license unless a parent, or, if there be neither father nor mother, the guardian, if there be such, shall consent to such proposed marriage, either personally to the Clerk, or by an instrument in writing attested by a witness and proved to the satisfaction of the Clerk.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1392, ch. 854, § 1292
July 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-75, § 5(a), 23 DCR 1182
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 32, 23 DCR 2544

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-111.
1973 Ed., § 30-111.